California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The district may borrow money for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the district lawfully incurred after the commencement of the fiscal year, but prior to the time moneys from the tax levy for the fiscal year are received by the district, in an amount, including interest to be paid thereon, which shall not exceed its estimated tax revenues for the fiscal year, and may evidence such borrowing by notes bearing interest at a rate not to exceed 6 percent per annum. The notes shall be payable from the tax levy from the then current fiscal year, which levy shall contain a sum sufficient to provide for the payment of the notes and the interest thereon. The form of the
 notes and the proceedings relating to their issuance and sale, shall be governed by the applicable provisions contained in Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------

98262.

The district shall not incur an indebtedness under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 98310) of this part which in the aggregate exceeds one (1) percent of the assessed value of all the real and personal property within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98263.

The district may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions or loans from the United States, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with and accept cooperation from, the United States, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, of any such
 transit facilities in accordance with any legislation which Congress or the Legislature of the State of California may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States or this state in the acquisition, construction, maintenance and operation of any such transit facilities. The district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Investments [98270. - 98270.]

98270.

The district may invest any surplus money in its treasury. The county treasurer shall act as treasurer of the district and he shall handle such investments as the board determines to make in accordance with the same policies and procedures that he follows in the investment of surplus county funds.

The board shall pay a reasonable fee to the county for the investment services of the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Property Taxation [98280. - 98289.5.]

98280.

The district may levy, and collect or cause to be collected, taxes for any lawful purpose subject to a maximum limit of five cents ($0.05) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value of all real estate and personal property within the district; provided, however, that the district shall have the further power to levy, collect or cause to be collected, said property taxes to a maximum limit of ten cents ($0.10) if the matter is first submitted to the voters in the district and a majority of those voting vote in favor of raising the maximum tax limit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98280.5.

If, in the opinion of the board, the transit operation revenues will not be sufficient for any and all lawful purposes the board shall levy a tax for such purpose or purposes and fix the amount of money necessary to be raised therefor by taxation as part of the general tax levy as set forth in Section 98280.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98281.

The board shall, as part of the general tax levy as set forth in Section 98280, levy and collect annually until the district’s bonds are paid, or until there is a sum in the treasury of the district set apart for that purpose to meet all sums coming due for principal and interest on the bonds as they become due a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest on the bonds and such part of the principal thereof as becomes due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available. If the maturity of the indebtedness created by the issue of bonds begins more than one year after the date of the issuance thereof, the tax shall be levied and collected
 annually at the time and in the manner aforesaid, sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due and to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal on or before maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98282.

The board may provide for the assessment, levy, and collection of taxes by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98283.

The board shall avail itself of the assessments made by the assessor of the county and of the assessments made by the State Board of Equalization for the county and shall take such assessments as the basis for the district taxation and have its taxes collected by the tax collector of the county, as part of the annual tax bill.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98284.

In such case the county auditor shall, on or before the third Monday in August of each year, transmit to the board a statement in writing showing the total value of all property within the district, ascertained from the assessments referred to in Section 98283 as equalized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98285.

The board shall on or before the first day of September fix the rate of taxes, designating the number of cents upon each one hundred dollars ($100) using as a basis the value of property transmitted to the board by the county auditor, which rate of taxation shall be sufficient to raise the amount previously fixed by the board. These acts by the board shall constitute a valid assessment of the property and a valid levy of the taxes so fixed but the rate of taxation shall not exceed the limit imposed by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98286.

The board shall immediately after fixing the rate of taxes as above provided transmit to the county auditor of the county a statement of the rate of taxes fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98287.

The district’s taxes so levied shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected the net amount, ascertained as provided in this article, shall be paid to the treasurer of the district, under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of other taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98288.

Whenever any real property has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid to the district by the county treasurer in the proportion which the tax due to the district bears to the total tax for which the property was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98289.

The compensation to be charged by and paid to any county for the performance of services under this article shall be fixed by agreement between the board of supervisors of the county and the board. The compensation shall in no event exceed one-half of 1 percent of all money collected for the district. The compensation collected by the county shall be placed to the credit of the county general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98289.3.

All taxes levied under this article are a lien on the property on which they are levied and shall become a lien at the same time as county taxes. The enforcement of the collection of such taxes shall be in the same manner and by the same means provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes, all the provisions of law relating to the enforcement of the latter being made a part of this article so far as applicable.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 98290 by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------

98289.5.

(a) On and after the operative date of the transactions and use tax ordinance pursuant to Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 98290) of this chapter, none of the provisions of this article shall be operative except this section and Section 98289.3.

(b) That portion of any property tax installment payable to the district is canceled if the installment may be paid without a delinquent penalty pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 2700) of Part 5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on or after the operative date of the transactions and use tax
 ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Retail Transactions and Use Tax [98290. - 98296.]

98290.

(a) A retail transactions and use tax ordinance may be adopted by the board in accordance with the provisions of Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, provided that two-thirds of the electors voting on the measure vote to authorize its enactment at a special election called for that purpose by the board.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) on or before January 1, 2020, shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limit
 established by that section.

(c) (1) In addition to any other taxes imposed pursuant to this section, the board may impose a retail transactions and use tax pursuant to subdivision (a) after January 1, 2024, if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The board adopts the ordinance approving the tax before January 1, 2035.

(B) The total tax rate under this
 subdivision is set at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limit established by that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

98290.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, the special taxes authorized in this article may also be imposed by qualified voter initiative, including a qualified voter initiative for which a petition has been circulated on or after January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 107, Sec. 1.   (AB 1919)   Effective August 6, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

98290.2.

(a) If the board or a qualified voter initiative proposes a measure pursuant to this article, the special election shall be consolidated with a statewide election by the board of supervisors of the County of Santa Cruz and the measure shall be submitted to the voters of the County of Santa Cruz.

(b) For the purpose of placement of a measure on the ballot, the district is a “district,” as defined in Section 317 of the Elections Code. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a measure proposed by the board or by a qualified voter initiative that requires voter approval shall be submitted to the voters of the County of Santa Cruz, as determined by the district, in accordance with the provisions of the Elections Code applicable to districts,
 including the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9300) of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10520 of the Elections Code, for any election at which the board or a qualified voter initiative proposes a measure pursuant to this article, the district shall reimburse the County of Santa Cruz for the incremental costs incurred by the county elections official related to submitting the measure to the voters with any eligible funds transferred to the district.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “incremental costs” includes all of the following:

(A) The cost to prepare, review, and revise the impartial analysis of the measure.

(B) The cost to prepare a translation of ballot materials into a
 language other than English by the county.

(C) The additional costs that exceed the costs incurred for other election races or ballot measures, if any, appearing on the same ballot in the County of Santa Cruz, including both of the following:

(i) The printing and mailing of ballot materials.

(ii) The canvass of the vote regarding the measure pursuant to Division 15 (commencing with Section 15000) of the Elections Code.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 9313 of the Elections Code, the legal counsel for the board shall prepare an impartial analysis of the measure. The impartial analysis prepared by the legal counsel for the board shall be subject to review and revision by the county counsel.

(e) The county elections official for the County of Santa Cruz shall serve as the elections official of the district for purposes of administering the ballot measure process and any election for the purposes set forth in this chapter.

(f) This section applies to any measure proposed by the board on or after January 1, 2026, or by a qualified voter initiative for which a petition has been circulated on or after January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 107, Sec. 2.   (AB 1919)   Effective August 6, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

98291.

Any transactions and use tax ordinance adopted shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing not less than 180 days after adoption of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------

98292.

The district may contract with the State Board of Equalization for its service in the preparations necessary to administer a transactions and use tax ordinance. The costs to be covered by the contract are to be for services of the types described in Section 7272 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for preparatory work up to the date of the adoption of the ordinance. Any dispute as to the amount of the costs shall be resolved in the same manner as provided in that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------

98293.

Prior to the operative date of the transactions and use tax ordinance, the district shall contract with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------

98294.

If the district shall not have contracted with the State Board of Equalization prior to the operative date of its transactions and use tax ordinance, it shall nevertheless so contract, and, in such case, the operative date shall be the first day of the first calendar quarter following the execution of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------

98295.

Repeal of the transactions and use tax ordinance shall not be operative earlier than the first day of the first calendar quarter following the adoption of the ordinance of repeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------

98296.

Whenever a bond election is held to authorize a bonded indebtedness pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 98310) of Chapter 7, the ordinance calling the election may include a statement that the transactions and use taxes, or a stated portion thereof, shall be levied, or continued to be levied, and used to the extent required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as they become due, to provide any sinking fund payments required therefor, and to create or maintain any reserve fund required therefor.

A vote in favor of the issuance of the bonds shall authorize the use of such taxes for such purposes. The
 transactions and use tax ordinance shall not be repealed until all bonds payable from the revenues derived from such taxes have been fully paid or provision has been made for their payment in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Existing Systems [98300. - 98305.]

98300.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Establish” includes establish, construct, complete, acquire, extend or reroute. It does not, however, include the maintenance and operation of any existing system by the district.

(b) “Existing system” means any transit service or system of a publicly or privately owned public utility situated entirely within the district or at least 75 percent of whose revenue vehicle miles for the preceding calendar year were operated within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98301.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, before the district may establish any transit service or system which may at any time divert, lessen, or compete for the patronage or revenues of any existing system, the district shall give a written notice to the public utility which is operating the existing system. The written notice shall describe the transit service or system which the district proposes to establish and shall state the time within which the district proposes to establish such service or system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98302.

The district shall not establish the proposed service or system, or maintain and operate the service or system until it has offered to purchase the buses and such other facilities of the existing system as it will have need of and use for, and such offer has either been rejected or the purchase completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98303.

The purchase price to be paid for the existing system, or that part thereof which the district desires to purchase, shall be the reasonable market value of the buses and other facilities of the existing system on the date that the district commences negotiations for such purchase.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98304.

The district and the public utility operating the existing system may agree upon the purchase price or they may agree that the purchase price is to be established by arbitration and upon the method of naming arbitrators and the method of conducting such arbitration. If they do not, the purchase price may be fixed and judgment entered thereon in a suit brought either by the public utility or the district in the superior court in and for the county in which is located that portion of the existing system to be acquired by the district which has the highest value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98305.

Section 851 of the Public Utilities Code does not apply to any contract for sale or sale of an existing system, or any portion thereof, pursuant to this chapter, and the Public Utilities Commission shall have no jurisdiction with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Bonds [98310. - 98381.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance [98310. - 98318.]

98310.

The district may from time to time incur a bonded indebtedness as provided in this chapter to pay the cost of acquiring, constructing or completing the whole or any portion of any transit facilities, or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district. The total amount of bonds issued and outstanding shall not exceed 1 percent of the assessed value of the taxable property of the district as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the County of Santa Cruz.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98311.

Whenever the board by resolution passed by vote of two-thirds of all its members determines that the public interest or necessity demands the acquisition, construction, or completion by the district of any transit facilities or any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, the cost of which will be too great to be paid out of the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district, it may at any subsequent meetings of the board provide by ordinance for the submission of the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purpose set forth in the resolution to
 the voters of the district at a special bond election held for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98312.

The ordinance calling a special bond election shall fix the date on which the election will be held, and the manner of holding the election and of voting for or against incurring the indebtedness. It shall also recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the transit facilities, works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property proposed to be acquired, constructed, or completed, the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness, which shall not exceed 6 percent per annum, payable semiannually or annually the
 first year and thereafter semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98313.

Propositions for incurring indebtedness for more than one object or purpose may be submitted at the same election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98314.

Any special bond election may be held separately, or may be consolidated with any other election, the provisions of this chapter setting forth the procedure for the calling and holding of the special bond election shall be complied with, except that the ordinance calling the election need not set forth election precincts, polling places, and officers of election, but may provide that the precincts, polling places, and officers of election shall be the same as those set forth in the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings calling the election with which the special bond election is consolidated, and shall refer to the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings by number and
 title, or by other definite description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98315.

The ordinance shall be published, and no other notice of election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98316.

The board shall comply with Article 3, (commencing with Section 9160) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code, the provisions of which are applicable to any bond election held pursuant to this article. Wherever the words “county clerk” or “county elections official” appear in the Elections Code the words “secretary of the board” shall be substituted, for the purposes of this article, and wherever the words “board of supervisors” appear in the Elections Code, the words “board of directors” shall be substituted, and wherever the words “district
 attorney or county counsel” appear in the Elections Code, the words “attorney for the district” shall be substituted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 206.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

98317.

The votes of two-thirds (23) of all voters voting on the proposition at the election are required to authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98318.

If the proposition submitted at a special bond election fails to receive the requisite number of votes, the board shall not within six months after the election hold another special election for the submission of a proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness substantially the same as the proposition voted upon at the prior election unless a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast at the last general statewide election is filed with the board, requesting that the proposition, or a proposition substantially the same, be submitted at an election to be called for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Form and Content [98330. - 98335.]

98330.

Bonds authorized by this chapter shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board; except that payment shall begin not later than 10 years from the date thereof and shall be completed in not more than 50 years from that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98331.

The board may divide any issue of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter into two or more series, and may fix different dates of issuance and different maturity dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of each series shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board, and the board shall fix a date not more than 10 years from the date of issuance of each series for the earliest maturity of such series and shall fix a date not more than 50 years from the date of issuance of each series for the final maturity of such series.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98332.

Pending the actual issuance or delivery of bonds, a district may issue temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts, of any denomination whatsoever, with or without coupon, and in such form as may be prescribed by the board, to be exchanged for definite bonds when ready for delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98333.

The bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the board determines, except that no bonds shall be issued of a denomination less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall be payable on the day and at the place or places fixed in the bond, and with interest at the rate specified therein, payable semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98334.

The board may at any time prior to the issuance and sale of any bonds provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity at not exceeding the par value and accrued interest plus a premium of not exceeding 5 percent upon the principal amount of the bonds, in which event the call price of such redemption shall be set forth on the face of the bond. Notice of such redemption shall be published. If there is no newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, then the publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation, printed and published within the district, then
 the publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation, printed and published within the county, or any part thereof is situated. The first publication shall be at least 30 days prior to the date fixed for the redemption. After the date fixed for such redemption interest on the bonds thereafter shall cease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98335.

The bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the board or by such officer of the district as the board shall by resolution authorize and designate for that purpose. They shall also be signed by the treasurer, and be countersigned by the auditor. The coupons of the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and be signed by the treasurer. All signatures and countersignatures on the bonds, except one of the signatures or countersignatures on the bonds, may be printed, lithographed or engraved. If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature or
 countersignature is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issue and Sale [98340. - 98342.]

98340.

The bonds may be issued and sold for not less than their par value, but otherwise as the board determines. Before selling any bonds, or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as the board may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to the price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either again give notice inviting bids or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98341.

All premiums and accrued interest received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds. The remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the district treasury to the credit of the proper fund, and shall be used exclusively for the objects or purposes for which the bonds were voted; provided that when such objects and purposes have been accomplished any moneys remaining shall be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds shall have been paid, any balance of money then remaining shall be transferred to the general fund of the
 district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98342.

In lieu of the immediate levy of a tax to pay the interest or any part thereof on any bonded indebtedness incurred in accordance with this part the board may, in the estimate of the amount of money necessary to be raised by the bonds, include a sum sufficient to pay interest on all of the bonds or part thereof during the period of acquisition, construction, or completion, but for no period in excess of five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Refunding [98350. - 98356.]

98350.

Whenever the board by resolution passed by a vote of two-thirds of all its members determines that the refunding of the whole or any portion of the bonded indebtedness will be of advantage to the district, the board may refund the bonded indebtedness or any portion thereof and issue refunding bonds of the district therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98351.

The issuance of refunding bonds shall not be construed as the incurring or increase of an indebtedness within the meaning of this act, and the approval of the voters is not required for the issuance of refunding bonds. The board may provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity in the ordinance authorizing the issuance of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98352.

Except as otherwise provided, the provisions of this chapter shall substantially govern as to all matters pertaining to the issuance of refunding bonds, including and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the form, execution, issuance, maturity, redemption, refunding, validation, the payment of interest from bond funds, and the status of the bonds as investments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98353.

Refunding bonds shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding the interest rate on the refunded bonds, but payment of the refunding bonds shall begin not later than one year from the date thereof and be completed in not more than 40 years from that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98354.

The proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds shall be applied only to the purchase, or retirement at not more than par and accrued interest, or the call price, of the bonded indebtedness for which the refunding bonds were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98355.

In lieu of selling refunding bonds and using the proceeds to purchase or retire the bonds to be refunded, the board may exchange refunding bonds at not less than par and accrued interest for the bonds so refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98356.

Wherever outstanding bonds are refunded they shall be surrendered to the treasurer of the district, who shall cancel them by endorsing on their face the manner in which the refunding was effected, whether by exchange or purchase, and the amount for which so purchased, (if any) and by perforating through each bond and each coupon attached thereto the word “canceled” together with the date of cancellation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Status as Investments [98360. - 98361.]

98360.

All bonds including refunding bonds issued by a district are legal investments for all trust funds and for the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies, and for the State School Fund and for all sinking funds under the control of the State Treasurer. Whenever any money or funds may be invested in or loaned upon the security of the bonds of the district; and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts by law may be used as security for the faithful performance or execution of any court or private trust or of any other act, bonds of the district may be used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98361.

All bonds of the district, to the same extent as bonds of any other municipality, are legal for use by any other municipality, are legal for use by any state or national bank or banks in the state as security for the deposit of funds of the state or of any county, city and county, city, municipality or other public or municipal corporation within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Validation [98370. - 98370.]

98370.

An action to determine validity of bonds, including refunding bonds, may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Revenue Bonds [98380. - 98381.]

98380.

As an alternative procedure for the raising of funds, the district may issue bonds, payable from revenues of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by the district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), all of the provisions of which are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98381.

The district is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The term “enterprise” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall, for all purposes of this part, include transit facilities and any and all parts thereof and all additions, extensions and improvements thereto and all other facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by a district or, in the alternative, may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for the acquisition, construction and completion of any one of such facilities. Nothing in this article
 shall prevent the district from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this part for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the facilities or works authorized hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or in the alternative, as the directors may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Annexation [98390. - 98396.]

98390.

Territory may be annexed to the district in the manner provided in this chapter. Territory to be annexed need not be contiguous to the present district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98391.

Whenever the board finds and determines that additional territory will be benefited by annexation to the district, it shall pass a resolution to that effect. Approval of the local agency formation commission shall be required for such annexation, and shall be obtained before the board holds its hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98392.

The resolution shall be passed by a vote of two-thirds of the members of the board and shall:

(a) Describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed.

(b) Designate the proposed annexation by an appropriate name.

(c) Declare that the area to be annexed to the district will be benefited by such annexation.

(d) Name the time and place for the hearing of objections by any person interested in the proposed
 annexation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98393.

The resolution, together with the names of the members of the board, voting for and against it shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper published in the territory proposed to be annexed, or if there is no such paper, then in some newspaper of general circulation, circulated in such territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98394.

On the day fixed for hearing or any day to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall hear and consider any objections presented to the annexation of the territory. After the hearing of objections, if it shall be determined by a vote of two-thirds (23) of all the members of the board that the territory proposed to be annexed will be benefited by such annexation, the board shall proceed to fix and determine the boundaries of the territory to be annexed to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98395.
